District of Columbia statutes.
47-126

Outstanding checks of Disbursing Officer — Payment of amounts.

The payee or bona fide holder of any check drawn by the Disbursing Officer of the District of Columbia, or by any former Disbursing Officer of said District, the amount of which has been so covered back into the Treasury of the United States, shall, upon application accompanied with competent and sufficient proof, and the surrender of such check, be paid the amount thereof from the said appropriation account to be denominated “Outstanding Liabilities, District of Columbia,” upon a claim therefor duly audited and approved by the Auditor of the District of Columbia, subject to like conditions and provisions as those imposed and required by the United States Code, with respect to the payment of amounts represented by checks of disbursing officers of the United States which have been covered back into the Treasury to the credit of outstanding liabilities.

History

Apr. 28, 1904, 33 Stat. 574, ch. 1827, § 2
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-126.
1973 Ed., § 47-125.

Editor's Notes

Disbursing Office abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-111.